Rhode Island, session 2025, SB214.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-11-18.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-11 entitled
"Suspension or Revocation of Licenses — Violations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-11-18.1. Driving after denial, revocation, or suspension for certain violations.
(a) Any person who drives a motor vehicle on any highway of this state who never applied
for a license or who drives after his or her application for a license has been refused, or after his or
her license has expired or who otherwise drives without a license or at a time when his or her license
to operate is suspended, revoked, or cancelled, for: (1) operating under the influence of a narcotic
drug or intoxicating liquor; (2) refusing to submit to a chemical test; (3) reckless driving; (3)(4)
manslaughter from the operation of a motor vehicle or operating so as to endanger resulting in
death; or (4)(5) three (3) moving violations within a one-year period; shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor for the first and second offenses and shall be deemed guilty of a felony for the third
or subsequent offenses.
(b) The division of motor vehicles upon receiving a record of the conviction of any person
upon a charge of driving a motor vehicle while the license of the person was suspended, for reasons
set forth in this section shall suspend the person’s license or deny the person’s application for any
length of time that it shall deem proper but in no case less than an additional three (3) months. Upon
receiving a record of conviction of a second violation of driving a motor vehicle while the license
of that person was suspended for reasons set forth in this section, the division of motor vehicles

shall suspend the person’s license or deny the person’s application for any length of time that it
shall deem proper but in no case less than an additional six (6) months. Any subsequent conviction
shall result in license revocation. Upon receiving a record of the conviction of any person upon a
charge of driving after his or her application for a license had been refused, or after his or her license
had been revoked or cancelled for reasons set forth in this section, the division of motor vehicles
shall not issue a new license for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license.
(c)(1) Upon a first conviction under this section a mandatory fine of five hundred dollars
($500) shall be imposed, and if the person was driving after his or her application for a license had
been refused, or at a time when his or her license to operate was suspended, revoked, or cancelled
for operating under the influence of a controlled substance or intoxicating liquor, or his or her
refusal to submit to a chemical test, reckless driving, manslaughter from the operation of a motor
vehicle, or operation so as to endanger, death resulting, the person shall be imprisoned for a
minimum of ten (10) days.
(2) A mandatory fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for a second conviction under this
section within a five (5) year period shall be imposed, and if the person was driving after his or her
application for a license had been refused, or at a time when his or her license to operate was
suspended, revoked, or cancelled for operating under the influence of a controlled substance or
intoxicating liquor or his or her refusal to submit to a chemical test, reckless driving, manslaughter
from the operation of a motor vehicle, or operation so as to endanger, death resulting, the person
shall be imprisoned for a minimum of six (6) months to one year.
(3) For any subsequent conviction within a five (5) year period, a fine of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) shall be imposed and the person may be imprisoned for up to one year or be
required to participate in a public service program designated and approved by the court. If the
person was driving after his or her application for a license had been refused or at a time when his
or her license to operate was suspended, revoked, or cancelled for: (i) operating under the influence
of a controlled substance or intoxicating liquor; (ii) his or her refusal to submit to a chemical test;
(iii) reckless driving; (iv) manslaughter from the operation of a motor vehicle; or (v) operating so
as to endanger, death resulting; the person shall be imprisoned for a minimum of one year.
Jurisdiction for violations of this section is given to the district court and the court shall have full
authority to impose any sentence authorized for violations of this section.
(d) No fines, suspensions, treatment, or jail provided for under this section can be
suspended.
(e) When any law enforcement officer arrests a person for driving a motor vehicle while
LC000489 - Page 2 of 4

the license of the person was suspended, revoked or cancelled for any of the reasons set forth in
subsections (a)(1) or (a)(2) of this section, and the vehicle so driven is owned in whole or in part
by the person so arrested, the license plates of that vehicle shall be impounded by the arresting
officer for a period of not less than ninety (90) days; provided, however, that if the charges
hereunder are dropped or dismissed for any reason, the license plates shall thereupon be returned
to the owner, and in no event shall such impoundment continue beyond the duration of any sentence
imposed under this section; and provided further, that if a court determines that such impoundment
would cause undue hardship to dependents of the offender, the court may order the division of
motor vehicles to issue temporary substitute license plates to the vehicle under such terms and for
such time as the court deems necessary to achieve substantial justice.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000489
========
LC000489 - Page 3 of 4